District of Columbia statutes.
50-1631

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Commercial bicycle operator” means an individual at least 16 years of age who receives financial compensation for the delivery or pick-up of goods or services by bicycle as a substantial part of his or her business or earnings, as defined by the Mayor in rules developed pursuant to § 50-1632(d)(3).

(2)

“Courier company” means any firm, partnership, company, corporation, or organization operating within the District of Columbia that employs, compensates, utilizes, or contracts with a commercial bicycle operator.

(3)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-97, § 2, 35 DCR 1045

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1411.

Short Title

Short title: The first section of D.C. Law 7-97 provided: “That this act may be cited as the ‘Commercial Bicycle Operators Licensing Act of 1987’.”